Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Article 4. Computation of Tax Rate.

§ 60.2-525.
Statement of employer’s benefit charges and taxes.

The Commission, by December 31 every year, shall provide every covered employer with a statement of the employer’s benefit charges and taxes for the preceding fiscal year. For any period in which benefit charges are not available, benefit charges shall be calculated as provided in §

60.2-530

.

History.

1981, c. 606, § 60.1-40.1; 1986, c. 480; 2003, c. 382.

Cross references.

For requirement that an employer charged with benefit wages shall be notified of the charges quarterly by the Commission, see §

60.2-528

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 382 substituted “December 31” for “July 1” and “fiscal” for “calendar.”

§ 60.2-526.
General provisions.

For each calendar year commencing after December 31, 1981, the tax rate of each employer, whose experience rating account has been chargeable with benefits during the most recent twelve completed calendar month period ending on June 30 of the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year for which a tax rate is being determined, shall be computed as provided in this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this section, the tax rate of each employer newly subject to this title, including any nonprofit organization which has elected to become liable for payments in lieu of taxes under the provisions of subsection B of §

60.2-501

and thereafter terminates such election, shall be 2.5 percent, except that at such time as it is eligible for computation as hereinafter provided, the tax rate shall become the computed rate. The Commission shall notify each such employer of his tax rate for such calendar year not later than December 31 immediately preceding such year, but the failure of any such employer to receive such notice shall not relieve him from liability for such tax.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-67; 1952, c. 184; 1954, c. 203; 1956, c. 440; 1960, c. 136; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-79; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1974, c. 466; 1980, c. 406; 1981, c. 606; 1982, c. 370; 1983, c. 16; 1986, c. 480; 1995, c. 323; 1997, c. 298; 1999, c. 313.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 323, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1997, c. 298, cl. 1, which provided for the expiration of the 1995 amendment to this section on January 1, 2000, was repealed by Acts 1999, c. 313, cl. 1. Therefore the 1995 amendment to this section no longer expires January 1, 2000.

Acts 1997, cc. 530 and 674, cl. 5 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of §

60.2-526

, changes in employer unemployment compensation tax rates resulting from fund adequacy multiplier and adequate fund balance recalculations made pursuant to this act [which amended §§

60.2-533

and

60.2-602

] shall become effective on July 1, 1997. The Virginia Employment Commission shall immediately notify employers of their recomputed tax rates for wages paid during the final two quarters of 1997.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 4.

§ 60.2-527.
Tax rate of certain foreign contractors.

For each calendar year, the tax rate of each foreign contractor doing business in Virginia shall be the maximum rate allowable by law for three years. At the end of the three-year period, such employer shall be eligible for the computed rate as provided in §

60.2-530

.

As used in this section, “foreign contractor” means (i) an out-of-state “contractor” as defined in §

54.1-1100

or (ii) an out-of-state “highway contractor” engaged in the type of contracting activities referred to in §

33.2-1106

, who does not maintain a principal place of business in Virginia as determined by the Commission, except that such employer need not be a member of any highway contractors association. Such determination by the Commission shall be final and not subject to judicial review.

History.

1982, c. 200, § 60.1-79.1; 1984, c. 468; 1986, c. 480.

Editor’s note.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

§ 60.2-528.
Individual benefit charges.

An individual’s “benefit charges” shall be computed in the following manner:

For each week benefits are received, a claimant’s “benefit charges” shall be equal to his benefits received for such week.

For each week extended benefits are received, pursuant to §

60.2-610

or

60.2-611

, a claimant’s “benefit charges” shall be equal to one-half his benefits received for such week. However, a claimant’s “benefit charges” for extended benefits attributable to service in the employ of a governmental entity referred to in subdivisions 1 through 3 of subsection A of §

60.2-213

shall be equal to the full amount of such extended benefit.

For each week partial benefits are received, the claimant’s “benefit charges” shall be computed (i) in the case of regular benefits as in subdivision 1 of this subsection, or (ii) in the case of extended benefits as in subdivision 2 of this subsection.

The employing unit from whom such individual was separated, resulting in the current period of unemployment, shall be the most recent employing unit for whom such individual has performed services for remuneration (i) during 30 days, whether or not such days are consecutive, or (ii) during 240 hours. If such individual’s unemployment is caused by separation from an employer, such individual’s “benefit charges” for such period of unemployment shall be deemed the responsibility of the last employer for (i) 30 days or (ii) 240 hours prior to such period of unemployment.
B. 1. The employing unit from whom such individual was separated, resulting in the current period of unemployment, shall be the most recent employing unit for whom such individual has performed services for remuneration (i) during 30 days, whether or not such days are consecutive, or (ii) during 240 hours. If such individual’s unemployment is caused by separation from an employer, such individual’s “benefit charges” for such period of unemployment shall be deemed the responsibility of the last employer for (i) 30 days or (ii) 240 hours prior to such period of unemployment.

Any employer charged with benefits paid shall be notified of the charges quarterly by the Commission. The amount specified shall be conclusive on the employer unless, not later than 30 days after the notice of benefit charges was mailed to its last known address or otherwise delivered to it, the employer files an appeal with the Commission, setting forth the grounds for such an appeal. Proceedings on appeal to the Commission regarding the amount of benefit charges under this subsection or a redetermination of such amount shall be in accordance with the provisions of §

60.2-500

. The decision of the Commission shall be subject to the provisions of §

60.2-500

. Any appeal perfected pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not address any issue involving the merits or conditions of a claimant’s separation from employment.

No “benefit charges” shall be deemed the responsibility of an employer of:

An individual whose separation from the work of such employer arose as a result of a violation of the law by such individual, which violation led to confinement in any jail or prison;

An individual who voluntarily left employment in order to accept other employment, genuinely believing such employment to be permanent;

An individual with respect to any weeks in which benefits are claimed and received after such date as that individual refused to accept an offer of rehire by the employer because such individual was in training with approval of the Commission pursuant to §

60.2-613

;

An individual who voluntarily left employment to enter training approved under § 236 of the Trade Act of 1974 (19 U.S.C. § 2296 et seq.);

An individual hired to replace a member of the Reserve of the United States Armed Forces or the National Guard called into active duty in connection with an international conflict and whose employment is terminated concurrent with and because of that member’s return from active duty;

An individual who left employment voluntarily with good cause due to a personal bona fide medical reason caused by a non-job-related injury or medical condition;

An individual participating as an inmate in (i) state or local work release programs pursuant to §

53.1-60

or

53.1-131

; (ii) community residential programs pursuant to §§

53.1-177

,

53.1-178

, and

53.1-179

; or (iii) any similar work release program, whose separation from work arose from conditions of release or parole from such program;

An individual who was unable to work at his regular employment due to a disaster for which the Governor, by executive order, has declared a state of emergency, if such disaster forced the closure of the employer’s business. In no case shall more than four weeks of benefit charges be waived; or

An individual who leaves employment to accompany his spouse to the location of the spouse’s new duty assignment if (i) the spouse is on active duty in the military or naval services of the United States; (ii) the spouse’s relocation to a new military-related assignment is pursuant to a permanent change of station order; (iii) the location of the spouse’s new duty assignment is not readily accessible from the individual’s place of employment; and (iv) the spouse’s new duty assignment is located in a state that, pursuant to statute, does not deem a person accompanying a military spouse as a person leaving work voluntarily without good cause.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-68; 1952, c. 184; 1954, c. 203; 1956, c. 440; 1958, c. 36; 1960, c. 136; 1962, cc. 12, 83; 1964, c. 3; 1966, c. 30; 1968, c. 9; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-80; 1970, c. 104; 1972, c. 764; 1974, c. 466; 1976, c. 708; 1977, c. 330; 1978, c. 493; 1979, c. 634; 1980, c. 463; 1981, cc. 250, 606; 1986, c. 480; 1989, c. 104; 1991, c. 249; 1991, Sp. Sess., c. 9; 1997, c. 202; 2001, c. 721; 2004, cc. 583, 977; 2005, cc. 44, 105; 2009, c. 878; 2014, c. 442.

Cross references.

For requirement that the Commission furnish an annual statement of employers’ benefit charges, see §

60.2-525

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 878, which had added a subdivision C 9 to this section and was contingent on adequate federal funding, was repealed by Acts 2014, c. 442, cl. 2. Both the 2009 and 2014 amendments to this section added substantially similar provisions in subdivision C 9.

Acts 2014, c. 442, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act enhance the benefits payable to an individual pursuant to Title 60.2 of the Code of Virginia. Pursuant to § 30-19.03:1.2 of the Code of Virginia, the Virginia Employment Commission, in consultation with the Department of Planning and Budget, estimates that over the ensuing eight years (i) the provisions of this act are projected to reduce the solvency level of the Unemployment Trust Fund by an average of 0 percent in each of the eight years and (ii) the projected average annual increase in state unemployment tax liability of employers on a per-employee basis that would result from the provisions of this act is $0.40.”

Acts 2014, c. 442, which added subdivision C 9, in cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall expire on December 31, 2020.”

Acts 2014, c. 442, cl. 4, which would have made subdivision C 9 expire on December 31, 2020, was repealed by Acts 2020, c. 261, cl. 1.

Acts 2014, c. 442, cl. 5 provides: “That the Virginia Employment Commission shall provide in its reports to the Commission on Unemployment Compensation information detailing (i) the number of claims that are paid as a result of the first enactment of this act, (ii) the effect of the payment of such claims on the solvency level and balance of the Unemployment Trust Fund, and (iii) the effect of such claims on pool taxes paid by employers in the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2020, c. 261, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act enhance the benefits payable to an individual pursuant to Title 60.2 of the Code of Virginia. Pursuant to § 30-19.03:1.2 of the Code of Virginia, the Virginia Employment Commission, in consultation with the Department of Planning and Budget, estimates that over the ensuing eight years (i) the provisions of this act are projected to reduce the solvency level of the Unemployment Trust Fund by an average of 0.1 percent in each of the eight years and (ii) the projected average annual increase in state unemployment tax liability of employers on a per-employee basis that would result from the provisions of this act is $0.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 721, in subsection C, deleted “or” at the end of subdivision 5, added “or” at the end of subdivision 6, and added subdivision 7.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 583, in subsection B, substituted “30” for “thirty” in three places; added subdivision C 8; and made related changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 977, in subsection B, substituted “30” for “thirty” in three places; and in subdivision C 7, deleted clause (i), which formerly read: “the Diversion Center Incarceration Program pursuant to §

19.2-316.3

” and redesignated former clauses (ii) through (iv) as present clauses (i) through (iii).

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 44 deleted “and if the individual returned to his regular full-time employment once the business reopened” at the end of the first sentence of subdivision C 8, and made stylitic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 105 substituted “in connection with an international conflict” for “as a result of Operation Desert Shield or Operation Desert Storm” in subdivision C 5 and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

For annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 513 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 4.

§ 60.2-528.1.
Charging of benefits relating to certain overpayments; penalty for pattern of failure to respond to requests for information.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Employer,” with regard to the timeliness and adequacy of responses, includes an agent of the employer used by the employer to respond to the Commission on the employer’s behalf; however, an employer’s agent’s failure to respond timely or adequately to requests for information with regard to claims involving the agent’s other clients shall not be used in determining whether the employer has established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to written requests for information.“Erroneous payment” means a payment of benefits under this title made prior to a determination by the Commission that the claimant is not eligible or qualified for the benefits paid.“Information relating to a claim” means information material to a determination or decision by the Commission relating to the payment of benefits under this title, including separation information and information required by the Commission for the establishment of a claim for compensation and information about wages, days, and hours worked.“Review period” means the 48 consecutive calendar month period ending on the June 30 that precedes the Commission’s next annual calculation of the employer’s benefit ratio pursuant to subdivision A 1 a of §

60.2-530

.“Written request” includes a request sent electronically.

An employer’s account shall not be relieved of charges relating to an erroneous payment if the Commission determines that:

The erroneous payment was made because the employer failed to respond timely or adequately to a written request by the Commission for information relating to the claim; and

The employer has established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to written requests by the Commission for information relating to claims.

For purposes of this section, an employer’s response to a written request by the Commission for information relating to a claim shall be deemed not to be:

“Adequate” if it fails to provide sufficient material facts to enable the Commission to make a correct determination regarding a claim for benefits; however, (i) a response shall not be deemed inadequate if the Commission failed to request the necessary information or if information is provided in a format other than as requested, provided that the information is capable of being read by the recipient, and (ii) there shall be a rebuttable presumption that an employer that participates in a fact-finding interview or responds fully to the questions set out on the written request for information has provided an adequate response; or

“Timely” if it is not made within 10 calendar days after the delivery or mailing of the Commission’s request for information.

An employer shall be deemed to have established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to written requests for information relating to claims if the Commission determines that the employer has failed to respond timely or adequately to a written request for information relating to a claim on four or more occasions within the applicable review period. The Commission shall not find that an employer has established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to written requests for information relating to claims unless the Commission has provided the employer with the notices required pursuant to subsection E.

The Commission shall provide the employer with a written notice following the employer’s first, second, and third determinations that the employer failed to respond timely or adequately to a written request for information relating to a claim within the applicable review period. Each such notice shall be delivered or mailed to the employer’s last known address of agency record and shall advise the employer of the potential implications of the employer’s failure to respond timely or adequately to written requests for such information.

Upon the Commission’s third determination within the applicable review period that an employer failed to respond timely or adequately to a written request for information relating to a claim, the Commission shall assess upon the employer a civil penalty of $75. A copy of the notice of assessment of a civil penalty shall be delivered or mailed to the employer with the notice of the employer’s third such failure as required pursuant to subsection E. Civil penalties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be paid into the Special Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund established pursuant to §

60.2-314

. The Commission may compromise, settle, and adjust any such penalty as authorized by §

60.2-521

.

An employer shall not be found to have failed to respond timely or adequately to a written request by the Commission for information relating to a claim if the Commission finds good cause for such failure. The Commission may not find good cause for an employer’s failure to respond timely or adequately to such a written request unless the failure is due to compelling and necessitous circumstances beyond the employer’s control.

If the Commission has determined that an employer has established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to written requests for information relating to claims, such determination shall remain in effect until the end of the applicable review period. Any benefit charges for an erroneous payment that the Commission has determined are not to be relieved from the employer’s account pursuant to subsection B shall remain chargeable to the employer’s account through the period ending on the fourth June 30 following the Commission’s determination.

The issue of whether an employer’s account shall be relieved of charges relating to an erroneous payment, including whether an erroneous payment was made because the employer failed to respond timely or adequately to a written request by the Commission for information relating to the claim, shall be decided in every Commission proceeding arising from an employer’s appeal of an award of benefits. Any such decision shall be subject to appeal pursuant to §

60.2-620

. Final decisions shall be used in determining whether the employer has established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to written requests for information relating to claims, whether the employer is subject to a civil penalty pursuant to subsection F, and whether the Commission has given the notices required pursuant to subsection E.

The costs of benefits charged to any governmental entity, Indian tribe, or nonprofit entity that is a reimbursable employing unit under this title shall not include any credits of benefit overpayments actually collected by the Commission if the Commission finds that the overpayment was made because the entity or its agent was at fault for failing to respond timely or adequately to a written request for information relating to a claim and the entity or agent has established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to such requests.

If the erroneous payment results from a combined-wage claim, the determination of noncharging for the combined-wage claim shall be made by the paying state. If the response from the employer does not meet the criteria established by the paying state for an adequate or timely response, the paying state shall promptly notify the transferring state of its determination, and the employer shall be appropriately charged.

This section applies to erroneous payments established on or after July 7, 2013.

History.

2013, c. 771.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 771, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Employment Commission shall monitor the implementation of §

60.2-528.1

created by this act and shall submit a report thereon to the Commission on Unemployment Compensation biennially commencing July 1, 2015. Each report of the Virginia Employment Commission shall provide information, aggregated so as not to identify specific employers or claimants, regarding the number of employers that have been deemed to have established a pattern of failing to respond timely or adequately to written requests for information, the amount of benefit charges not relieved from employers’ accounts as a result of the implementation of such section, the assessment of civil penalties pursuant to such section, the effectiveness of the section in reducing the number and amount of erroneous payments made to claimants and in increasing the percentage of employers that provide timely and adequate responses to requests for information relating to claims for compensation, and the effect thereof on the solvency level of the Unemployment Trust Fund and the average state unemployment tax per employee. Each report shall include information regarding the burden of complying with and administering the section and recommendations for legislative changes that would ease such burdens and increase the section’s effectiveness.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 539, cl. 5, which expires on July 1, 2022, provides: “That all costs to the Unemployment Compensation Fund (the Fund) resulting from the provisions of this act for overpayments of benefits under Chapter 6 (§

60.2-600

et seq.) of Title 60.2 of the Code of Virginia shall be reimbursed to the Fund from the general fund in the general appropriation act. For an overpayment waived pursuant to this act, no employer shall be responsible for (i) reimbursing benefits or (ii) benefits charges, except as provided in §

60.2-528.1

of the Code of Virginia.”

§ 60.2-529.
Employer’s benefit charges.

Any employer’s benefit charges for a given calendar year shall be the total of the “benefit charges” which, pursuant to the provisions of §

60.2-528

, are deemed to be the responsibility of such employer.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-69; 1954, c. 203; 1962, c. 6; 1964, c. 3; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-81; 1974, c. 466; 1977, c. 330; 1981, c. 606; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-530.
Benefit ratio.

The “benefit ratio” of each employer for a given calendar year shall be the percentage, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of a percent, equal to the employer’s benefit charges for the 12 consecutive calendar month period ending on June 30 immediately preceding that calendar year, divided by the total of his payroll for the same period except that:
A. 1. The “benefit ratio” of each employer for a given calendar year shall be the percentage, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of a percent, equal to the employer’s benefit charges for the 12 consecutive calendar month period ending on June 30 immediately preceding that calendar year, divided by the total of his payroll for the same period except that:

For an employer whose account has been chargeable with benefit charges for 48 or more consecutive completed calendar months, the “benefit ratio” shall be the percentage, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of a percent, equal to the employer’s benefit charges for the most recent 48 consecutive completed calendar month period ending on June 30 immediately preceding that calendar year, divided by the total of his payrolls for the same period;

For an employer whose account has been chargeable with benefit charges for 36 but less than 48 consecutive completed calendar months the “benefit ratio” shall be the percentage equal to the employer’s benefit charges for the most recent 36 consecutive completed calendar month period ending on June 30 immediately preceding that calendar year divided by his payroll for the same period; and

For an employer whose account has been chargeable with benefit charges for 24 but less than 36 consecutive completed calendar months the “benefit ratio” shall be the percentage, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of a percent, equal to the employer’s benefit charges for the most recent 24 consecutive completed calendar month period ending on June 30 immediately preceding that calendar year divided by his payroll for the same period.

Where benefit charges are not available for any or all of the periods used to determine an employer’s benefit ratio, benefit wages divided by three shall be used in lieu of benefit charges for those periods benefit charges are not available, in combination with benefit charges, where available to determine an employer’s benefit ratio.

2.

The term “payroll” as used in this section means the greater of (i) the taxable payroll on which taxes have been paid on or before September 30 immediately following such June 30 or (ii) $1.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-70; 1954, c. 203; 1956, c. 440; 1960, c. 136; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-82; 1977, c. 330; 1981, c. 606; 1986, c. 480; 2014, c. 191.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 191 substituted “12” for “twelve” in subdivision A 1; in subdivision A 1 a, substituted “48” for “forty-eight” twice; in subdivision A 1 b, substituted “36” for “thirty-six” twice and “48” for “forty-eight”; in subdivision A 1 c, substituted “24” for “twenty-four” twice and “36” for “thirty-six”; and in subdivision A 2, substituted “in this section” for “herein” and inserted “the greater of (i)” and “or (ii) $1.”

§ 60.2-531.
Experience rating tax; table.

Subject to the provisions of §

60.2-533

, the experience rating tax rate for each employer for the calendar year 1982 and subsequent years shall be the percent in the column corresponding to the employer’s benefit ratio, except that if the employer’s benefit ratio exceeds 6.2 percent, the column under 6.2 percent shall be the appropriate column, and in the line corresponding to the fund balance factor for the year pursuant to §

60.2-533

.

BENEFIT RATIOS .00 .10 .20 .30 .40 .50 .60 .70 IN PERCENTUM FUND BALANCE TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX FACTOR RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % 120 0.00 0.07 0.15 0.22 0.30 0.37 0.45 0.52 115 0.00 0.08 0.16 0.24 0.32 0.40 0.48 0.56 110 0.00 0.08 0.17 0.25 0.34 0.42 0.51 0.59 105 0.00 0.09 0.18 0.27 0.36 0.45 0.54 0.63 100 0.00 0.10 0.20 0.30 0.40 0.50 0.60 0.70 95 0.10 0.10 0.21 0.31 0.42 0.52 0.63 0.73 90 0.10 0.11 0.22 0.33 0.44 0.55 0.66 0.77 85 0.10 0.11 0.23 0.34 0.46 0.57 0.69 0.80 80 0.10 0.12 0.24 0.36 0.48 0.60 0.72 0.84 75 0.10 0.12 0.25 0.37 0.50 0.62 0.75 0.87 70 0.10 0.13 0.26 0.39 0.52 0.65 0.78 0.91 65 0.10 0.13 0.27 0.40 0.54 0.67 0.81 0.94 60 0.10 0.14 0.28 0.42 0.56 0.70 0.84 0.98 55 0.10 0.14 0.29 0.43 0.58 0.72 0.87 1.01 50 0.10 0.15 0.30 0.45 0.60 0.75 0.90 1.05

Click to view

BENEFIT RATIOS .80 .90 1.00 1.10 1.20 1.30 1.40 1.50 IN PERCENTUM FUND BALANCE TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX FACTOR RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % 120 0.60 0.67 0.75 0.82 0.90 0.97 1.05 1.12 115 0.64 0.72 0.80 0.88 0.96 1.04 1.12 1.20 110 0.68 0.76 0.85 0.93 1.02 1.10 1.19 1.27 105 0.72 0.81 0.90 0.99 1.08 1.17 1.26 1.35 100 0.80 0.90 1.00 1.10 1.20 1.30 1.40 1.50 95 0.84 0.94 1.05 1.15 1.26 1.36 1.47 1.57 90 0.88 0.99 1.10 1.21 1.32 1.43 1.54 1.65 85 0.92 1.03 1.15 1.26 1.38 1.49 1.61 1.72 80 0.96 1.08 1.20 1.32 1.44 1.56 1.68 1.80 75 1.00 1.12 1.25 1.37 1.50 1.62 1.75 1.87 70 1.04 1.17 1.30 1.43 1.56 1.69 1.82 1.95 65 1.08 1.21 1.35 1.48 1.62 1.75 1.89 2.02 60 1.12 1.26 1.40 1.54 1.68 1.82 1.96 2.10 55 1.16 1.30 1.45 1.59 1.74 1.88 2.03 2.17 50 1.20 1.35 1.50 1.65 1.80 1.95 2.10 2.25

Click to view

BENEFIT RATIOS 1.60 1.70 1.80 1.90 2.00 2.10 2.20 2.30 IN PERCENTUM FUND BALANCE TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX FACTOR RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % 120 1.20 1.27 1.35 1.42 1.50 1.57 1.65 1.72 115 1.28 1.36 1.44 1.52 1.60 1.68 1.76 1.84 110 1.36 1.44 1.53 1.61 1.70 1.78 1.87 1.95 105 1.44 1.53 1.62 1.71 1.80 1.89 1.98 2.07 100 1.60 1.70 1.80 1.90 2.00 2.10 2.20 2.30 95 1.68 1.78 1.89 1.99 2.10 2.20 2.31 2.41 90 1.76 1.87 1.98 2.09 2.20 2.31 2.42 2.53 85 1.84 1.95 2.07 2.18 2.30 2.41 2.53 2.64 80 1.92 2.04 2.16 2.28 2.40 2.52 2.64 2.76 75 2.00 2.12 2.25 2.37 2.50 2.62 2.75 2.87 70 2.08 2.21 2.34 2.47 2.60 2.73 2.86 2.99 65 2.16 2.29 2.43 2.56 2.70 2.83 2.97 3.10 60 2.24 2.38 2.52 2.66 2.80 2.94 3.08 3.22 55 2.32 2.46 2.61 2.75 2.90 3.04 3.19 3.33 50 2.40 2.55 2.70 2.85 3.00 3.15 3.30 3.45

Click to view

BENEFIT RATIOS 2.40 2.50 2.60 2.70 2.80 2.90 3.00 3.10 IN PERCENTUM FUND BALANCE TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX FACTOR RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % 120 1.80 1.87 1.95 2.02 2.10 2.17 2.25 2.32 115 1.92 2.00 2.08 2.16 2.24 2.32 2.40 2.48 110 2.04 2.12 2.21 2.29 2.38 2.46 2.55 2.63 105 2.16 2.25 2.34 2.43 2.52 2.61 2.70 2.79 100 2.40 2.50 2.60 2.70 2.80 2.90 3.00 3.10 95 2.52 2.62 2.73 2.83 2.94 3.04 3.15 3.25 90 2.64 2.75 2.86 2.97 3.08 3.19 3.30 3.41 85 2.76 2.87 2.99 3.10 3.22 3.33 3.45 3.56 80 2.88 3.00 3.12 3.24 3.36 3.48 3.60 3.72 75 3.00 3.12 3.25 3.37 3.50 3.62 3.75 3.87 70 3.12 3.25 3.38 3.51 3.64 3.77 3.90 4.03 65 3.24 3.37 3.51 3.64 3.78 3.91 4.05 4.18 60 3.36 3.50 3.64 3.78 3.92 4.06 4.20 4.34 55 3.48 3.62 3.77 3.91 4.06 4.20 4.35 4.49 50 3.60 3.75 3.90 4.05 4.20 4.35 4.50 4.65

Click to view

BENEFIT RATIOS 3.20 3.30 3.40 3.50 3.60 3.70 3.80 3.90 IN PERCENTUM FUND BALANCE TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX FACTOR RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % 120 2.40 2.47 2.55 2.62 2.70 2.77 2.85 2.92 115 2.56 2.64 2.72 2.80 2.88 2.96 3.04 3.12 110 2.72 2.80 2.89 2.97 3.06 3.14 3.23 3.31 105 2.88 2.97 3.06 3.15 3.24 3.33 3.42 3.51 100 3.20 3.30 3.40 3.50 3.60 3.70 3.80 3.90 95 3.36 3.46 3.57 3.67 3.78 3.88 3.99 4.09 90 3.52 3.63 3.74 3.85 3.96 4.07 4.18 4.29 85 3.68 3.79 3.91 4.02 4.14 4.25 4.37 4.48 80 3.84 3.96 4.08 4.20 4.32 4.44 4.56 4.68 75 4.00 4.12 4.25 4.37 4.50 4.62 4.75 4.87 70 4.16 4.29 4.42 4.55 4.68 4.81 4.94 5.07 65 4.32 4.45 4.59 4.72 4.86 4.99 5.13 5.26 60 4.48 4.62 4.76 4.90 5.04 5.18 5.32 5.46 55 4.64 4.78 4.93 5.07 5.22 5.36 5.51 5.65 50 4.80 4.95 5.10 5.25 5.40 5.55 5.70 5.85

Click to view

BENEFIT RATIOS 4.00 4.10 4.20 4.30 4.40 4.50 4.60 4.70 IN PERCENTUM FUND BALANCE TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX FACTOR RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % 120 3.00 3.07 3.15 3.22 3.30 3.37 3.45 3.52 115 3.20 3.28 3.36 3.44 3.52 3.60 3.68 3.76 110 3.40 3.48 3.57 3.65 3.74 3.82 3.91 3.99 105 3.60 3.69 3.78 3.87 3.96 4.05 4.14 4.23 100 4.00 4.10 4.20 4.30 4.40 4.50 4.60 4.70 95 4.20 4.30 4.41 4.51 4.62 4.72 4.83 4.93 90 4.40 4.51 4.62 4.73 4.84 4.95 5.06 5.17 85 4.60 4.71 4.83 4.94 5.06 5.17 5.29 5.40 80 4.80 4.92 5.04 5.16 5.28 5.40 5.52 5.64 75 5.00 5.12 5.25 5.37 5.50 5.62 5.75 5.87 70 5.20 5.33 5.46 5.59 5.72 5.85 5.98 6.11 65 5.40 5.53 5.67 5.80 5.94 6.07 6.20 6.20 60 5.60 5.74 5.88 6.02 6.16 6.20 6.20 6.20 55 5.80 5.94 6.09 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 50 6.00 6.15 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20

Click to view

BENEFIT RATIOS 4.80 4.90 5.00 5.10 5.20 5.30 5.40 5.50 IN PERCENTUM FUND BALANCE TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX FACTOR RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % 120 3.60 3.67 3.75 3.82 3.90 3.97 4.05 4.12 115 3.84 3.92 4.00 4.08 4.16 4.24 4.32 4.40 110 4.08 4.16 4.25 4.33 4.42 4.50 4.59 4.67 105 4.32 4.41 4.50 4.59 4.68 4.77 4.86 4.95 100 4.80 4.90 5.00 5.10 5.20 5.30 5.40 5.50 95 5.04 5.14 5.25 5.35 5.46 5.56 5.67 5.77 90 5.28 5.39 5.50 5.61 5.72 5.83 5.94 6.05 85 5.52 5.63 5.75 5.86 5.98 6.09 6.20 6.20 80 5.76 5.88 6.00 6.12 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 75 6.00 6.12 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 70 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 65 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 60 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 55 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 50 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20

Click to view

BENEFIT RATIOS 5.60 5.70 5.80 5.90 6.00 6.10 6.20 IN PERCENTUM FUND BALANCE TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX TAX FACTOR RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE RATE IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % IN % 120 4.20 4.27 4.35 4.42 4.50 4.57 5.40 115 4.48 4.56 4.64 4.72 4.80 4.88 5.40 110 4.76 4.84 4.93 5.01 5.10 5.18 5.40 105 5.04 5.13 5.22 5.31 5.40 5.49 5.58 100 5.60 5.70 5.80 5.90 6.00 6.10 6.20 95 5.88 5.98 6.09 6.19 6.20 6.20 6.20 90 6.16 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 85 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 80 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 75 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 70 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 65 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 60 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 55 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 50 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20 6.20

Click to view

History.

1981, c. 606, § 60.1-84.1; 1986, c. 480; 1987, c. 114; 1988, c. 766; 1995, c. 515.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 4.

§ 60.2-532.
Pool cost charges.

As of January 1 of each year, to all experience rating tax rates established pursuant to §

60.2-531

, to all assigned tax rates established pursuant to §§

60.2-515

,

60.2-526

,

60.2-527

and

60.2-538

, there shall be added the pool cost charges as determined in subsection B of this section.

The pool cost charge rate rounded to the nearest one-hundredth of a percent shall be determined as follows:

Pool costs for a given calendar year shall be those costs defined in subdivision 2 of this subsection for the thirty-six consecutive calendar month period ending on June 30 immediately preceding that calendar year. The pool cost charge rate shall be pool costs divided by payrolls for such period.

Pool costs shall consist of (i) benefit charges which cannot be assigned to an individual employer pursuant to §§

60.2-210

,

60.2-212

through

60.2-219

, or subsection C of §

60.2-528

, or cannot be charged to an individual employer due to his becoming an inactive account pursuant to §

60.2-210

or §

60.2-509

, (ii) the difference in the amount the Commission pays pursuant to subdivision 2 of subsection A of §

60.2-609

and the amount the Commission receives pursuant to subdivision 3 of subsection A of §

60.2-609

, and (iii) the difference between the benefit charges of all employers with a maximum experience rating tax rate and the amount of the taxes resulting from applying the maximum experience rating tax rate against the payrolls of the same employers. The term “payrolls” as used in this section shall mean the taxable payroll on which taxes have been paid on or before September 30 immediately following such June 30.

When the fund balance factor for the most recent twelve-month period ending on June 30 of the immediately preceding calendar year is greater than fifty percent, interest earned on the balance which shall stand to the credit of the account of the Commonwealth of Virginia in the Unemployment Trust Fund in the treasury of the United States shall be subtracted from pool costs, except that in no instance shall pool costs be less than zero.

History.

1981, c. 606, § 60.1-84.2; 1984, c. 458; 1986, c. 480; 1987, c. 114; 1990, c. 908; 1993, c. 249.

§ 60.2-533.
Fund balance factor.

As of July 1 of each calendar year, a fund balance factor, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of a percent, shall be determined as follows:The net assets which shall be compared with the “adequate balance” as determined in subsection B of this section, shall be comprised of the balance which shall stand to the credit of the account of the Commonwealth of Virginia in the Unemployment Trust Fund in the Treasury of the United States; amounts withdrawn therefrom but not expended; employer payments not yet transferred to such account; net employer taxes receivable; and amounts due from claimants and other states, minus payables due to claimants, employers, other funds of the Virginia Employment Commission, and other states. The resulting percent shall be termed the “fund balance factor,” except that if the percent determined is less than fifty percent, the fund balance factor shall be fifty percent.

As of July 1 of each calendar year, the Commission shall determine the “adequate balance” for the trust fund as follows:For the twenty-year period ending July 1 of the year of determination, the highest ratios of benefits divided by total wages of three separate consecutive four-quarter periods shall be averaged and multiplied by 1.38 to determine the fund adequacy multiplier. The fund adequacy multiplier shall be multiplied by the total wages for the year in question to determine the “adequate fund balance” for that year.

A fund building rate of two-tenths percent shall be added to all experience rating rates established pursuant to §

60.2-531

, and to all assigned tax rates established pursuant to §§

60.2-515

,

60.2-526

,

60.2-527

and

60.2-538

, except that such rate shall not be applied if the fund balance factor determined pursuant to subsection A of this section exceeds fifty percent.

History.

1981, c. 606, § 60.1-85.1; 1986, c. 480; 1993, c. 249; 1996, c. 305; 1997, cc. 530, 674.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, cc. 530 and 674, cl. 5 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of §

60.2-526

, changes in employer unemployment compensation tax rates resulting from fund adequacy multiplier and adequate fund balance recalculations made pursuant to this act [which amended §§

60.2-533

and

60.2-602

] shall become effective on July 1, 1997. The Virginia Employment Commission shall immediately notify employers of their recomputed tax rates for wages paid during the final two quarters of 1997.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 4.

§ 60.2-534.
Tax rate defined.

As used in this article
“tax rate”
means the tax or percentage of wages payable by an employer with respect to employment.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-74; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-87; 1986, c. 480.